Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5539YC (4) 91 mb/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0l. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 279.58 relating to student dress code 4 policies in the same manner as a school district. 5 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 6 by adding the following new paragraph: 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . v. Be subject to and comply with the 8 requirements of section 279.58 relating to student dress code 9 policies in the same manner as a school district. 10 Sec. 3. Section 279.58, Code 2026, is amended by striking 11 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 12 279.58 School dress code policies. 13 1. The board of directors of a public school district shall 14 adopt a dress code policy for students in grades kindergarten 15 through twelve requiring students to dress in attire that is 16 all of the following: 17 a. Appropriate for an educational setting. 18 b. Presentable, promoting personal hygiene, neatness, and 19 modesty. 20 2. The dress code policy required in this section must apply 21 to all school-related activities, including regular school 22 hours, extracurricular activities, and school-sponsored events, 23 unless otherwise specified by the school district. 24 3. The dress code policy required in this section must 25 include, at a minimum, all of the following requirements: 26 a. Clothing must be clean, in good repair, and free of 27 language, symbols, or images that promote illegal activities. 28 b. Attire must adequately cover the body, and clothing that 29 exposes undergarments or midriffs shall be prohibited. 30 c. Footwear must be worn at all times and shall be 31 appropriate for the school environment to ensure safety and 32 hygiene. 33 d. Accessories or attire, including gang-related attire, 34 that the board of directors of a school district determine 35 -1- LSB 5539YC (4) 91 mb/jh 1/ 4 H.F. _____ is disruptive to the health, safety, or positive educational 1 environment of students and staff must be prohibited. 2 4. a. The board of directors of a school district may 3 establish additional dress code requirements tailored to the 4 needs of its student population that are consistent with this 5 section and do not infringe upon rights protected by the 6 Constitution of the State of Iowa and the Constitution of the 7 United States. 8 b. The board of directors of a school district may adopt 9 uniform policies or specific attire guidelines, including 10 requiring collared shirts, specific colors, or other 11 standardized clothing, as determined to be appropriate by the 12 board. 13 5. a. The board of directors of a school district shall 14 establish procedures for enforcing the dress code policy, 15 including clear consequences for violations, which may include 16 verbal warnings, parent or guardian notification, or other 17 disciplinary actions consistent with the districtâs student 18 conduct policies. 19 b. The board of directors of a school district shall provide 20 reasonable accommodations for students based on religious 21 beliefs, medical needs, or other circumstances protected under 22 state or federal law. 23 6. The dress code policy shall be clearly communicated to 24 students and parents at the beginning of each school year and 25 made publicly available on the school districtâs internet site. 26 7. The dress code policy shall be applied uniformly to 27 all students without discrimination on the basis of race, 28 color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or any other 29 characteristic protected under state or federal law. 30 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school years 31 beginning on or after July 1, 2026. 32